src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! # Morphophonological rules for Hill Mari 

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-mrj/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphabet, Sets and Definitions 
 
Alphabet 
!! ### Alphabet 
!! #### Letters of the alphabet 
 
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ҥ о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӓ ӹ !!= * **@CODE@** 
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ҥ О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Ӓ Ӹ !!= * **@CODE@** 
 
!! #### Archiphonemes for vowels 
 %{аӓ%}:ӓ  !!= * **@CODE@** a/ä alternation in vowel harmony 
 Е3:е !!= * **@CODE@** ӓвӓмвлӓ 
 Е2:0 !!= * **@CODE@** 
 %{ыӹØ%}:0 !!= * **@CODE@** 
 %{ыӹе%}:0 !! * **@CODE@** used in verb affix onset 
 %{ыӹэ%}:0 !! * **@CODE@** used in noun affix onset ine, ill 
 %{аӓе%}:0 !! * **@CODE@** used in verb affix onset 
 %{ыӹ%}:0  !!= * **@CODE@** 
 А2:а !!= * **@CODE@** 
 Ь2:0 !!= * **@CODE@**  except with V АМ +Prt1+Sg1-3 
!  е1:е а1:а и1:и у1:у ӱ1:ӱ 
!  Е1:Е %{аӓ%}:А И1:И У1:У Ӱ1:Ӱ 
! JMR 2012-09-18 
! %{аӓ%}:а 
! Е2:е != * **@CODE@** 
! %{ыӹ%}:ы 
! %{ыӹ%}:ӹ 
! А2:я 
 
!! #### Triggers 
 %{front%}:0 %{back%}:0 !!= * **@CODE@** front-back vowel harmony 
%^ConsTransf:0 !!= * **@CODE@** 
%^KIN:0        !!= * **@CODE@**  with ӓвӓ in +PxSg1+Sg+Gen etc. 
%^А2ЫӸ:0       !!= * **@CODE@**  with карта and картын витринӹн 
 
! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

!! #### Boundary symbols 
 
 %> !!= * **@CODE@** 
 #  !!  * hash # 
 %- !!= * **@CODE@** 

« »

 ; 
 
 
!! ### Sets 
 
Sets 
BackLabVow =   о у ё ю О У Ё Ю ; 				     !!= * **@CODE@** 
FrontLabVow =   ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ; 						     !!= * **@CODE@** 
NonLabVow =   ӓ а е и э я Ӓ А Е И Э Я ; 		     !!= * **@CODE@** 
Vow =  BackLabVow FrontLabVow NonLabVow ы Ы  ӹ Ӹ ;   !!= * **@CODE@** 
BackVow = BackLabVow а А ы Ы ; 					     !!= * **@CODE@** 
FrontVow = FrontLabVow е и э ӓ ӹ Е И Э Ӓ Ӹ ; 	     !!= * **@CODE@** 
ArchiVow = %{ыӹØ%} %{ыӹ%} %{аӓ%} ; 				     !!= * **@CODE@** 
FullVow = BackLabVow FrontLabVow NonLabVow ;  	     !!= * **@CODE@** 
CnsNoLN =  б в г д ж з к м ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш 	     !!= * **@CODE@** 
           Б В Г Д Ж З К М Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;     !!= * **@CODE@** 
Cns =  б в г д ж з к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш 	     !!= * **@CODE@** 
       Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;     !!= * **@CODE@** 
Cst =  к п т ф х ц ч ш с 						     !!= * **@CODE@** 
       К П Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ц ;  					     !!= * **@CODE@** 
Ltrs = Vow Cns Й й  ъ ь Ъ Ь ; 					     !!= * **@CODE@** 
all =  Ltrs  %- ; 								     !!= * **@CODE@** 
HarmDummies = %{back%} %{front%} ; 				     !!= * **@CODE@** 

 
!! ### Definitions 
 
Definitions 
 
!! Back Harmony BHARM
BHARM = [ %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: |:FrontVow]* ] ; 
! [ %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: ]* ] ; 2024-03-28
 
!! Front Harmony FHARM
FHARM = [ %{front%}: \[ # | %{back%}: |:BackVow]* ] ; 
! [ %{front%}: \[ # | %{back%}: ]* ] ; 2024-03-28
 
 
!! LFH
LFC =  [ :FrontVow | Е2:е | Е2:э | :е | :ӹ | :Ӹ ] \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]* (%{аӓ%}:я ) \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]*  (%^А2ЫӸ:0) ; 
! # [ Cns | й ]*  [ :FrontVow | Е2: | :е | :ӹ | :Ӹ ] \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]* (%{аӓ%}:я ) \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]*  (%^А2ЫӸ:0) ; 

!! LBH
LBC = # [ Cns | й ]* [ :BackVow ] \[ #: | :FrontVow | :Ӹ | :ӹ ]* (%{аӓ%}:я) \[ #: | :FrontVow | :Ӹ | :ӹ ]* (%^А2ЫӸ:0) ; 
! [ :BackVow ] ( %> | %^ConsTransf:0 | %^KIN:0 | BackVow | %{аӓ%}:а | %{аӓ%}:я | %{ыӹØ%}:ы | Ь2:0 | %{ыӹØ%}:0 | Е3:0 | %{ыӹ%}:ы | Cns: )* ; 
 
 
!! ## Rules 
 
Rules 
 
!! ### Palatalisation rules
 
"Palatal mark loss before vowel rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
    ь:0  <=>   _ (HarmDummies:) %> А2: ; 
         [ н | л ] _ (HarmDummies:) %> [ :я | :е | :и | :ю ]  ; 
    
"й Deletion in front of я Suffix and others rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  й:0 <=> _ (HarmDummies:) [( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | :я | :е | :и | :ю ] | [ ы:0 | ӹ:0 ] ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | %{аӓ%}: | %{ыӹе%}:| е ] ]  ; 
    _ (HarmDummies:) %> %{аӓ%}: ; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€# кай%>%{аӓ%}ш 
!!€0 ка00яш 
         
  
"Ь2:ь Palatal mark for V АМ +Prt1+Sg1 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Ь2:ь <=> [ н | л ] (HarmDummies:) _ %> %{ыӹØ%}: ; 

!! толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€ тол%{back%}Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%}м 
!!€ тол0ь%>ым 
 
"Ь2:0 Palatal mark for V АМ +Prt1+Sg1 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Ь2:0 <=> [ FullVow | й | CnsNoLN: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) _ %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: | [н | д] %{аӓ%}: ] ; 
         Cns (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) _ %> [н | д] %{аӓ%}: ; 
 
"Ь2:ш Palatal mark for V ЕМ +Prt1+Sg1 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Ь2:ш <=> [ ӹ | ы ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) _ %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: | [н | д] %{аӓ%}: ] ; 
 
 
 
!! ### Vowel rules 
"Onset vowel in а rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{аӓе%}:а <=>  [Cns - [й:] |BackVow - [ы:]] %{back%}: %>  _ ; 
 
 
"Onset vowel in ӓ rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{аӓе%}:ӓ <=>  [Cns - [й:] |FrontVow - [ӹ:]] %{front%}: %>  _ ; 
 
"Onset vowel in я rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{аӓе%}:я <=> й: (HarmDummies:) %>  _ ; 
 
"Onset vowel in е rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{аӓе%}:е <=> [ ы: | ӹ: ] (HarmDummies:) %>  _ ; 
 
!"Onset vowel in э rule"
!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
! %{аӓе%}:э <=> [Vow - [ ы: | ӹ: ]] (HarmDummies:) %>  _ ; 
 
 
! JMR 2012-09-18 
"Onset vowel loss in suffix ыӹ0 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   %{ыӹØ%}:0 <=> :Vow (HarmDummies:) ( %^KIN:0 ) %> _ ; 
   	   _ %> [ е | %{ыӹе%}: | %{ыӹØ%}:ы | %{ыӹØ%}:ӹ ] ; 
           %> ж %{ыӹ%}: %> _  ; 
          [[ а:ӹ | а:ы ] %^А2ЫӸ:0| и ] %> _ ; 
          
 
 
"Onset vowel loss in suffix Е3 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   Е3:0 <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) %^KIN:0 %> _ ; 
           %> ж %{ыӹ%}: %> _  ; 
 
 
 "Onset vowel loss in suffix Е2 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
   Е2:0 <=> %> ж %{ыӹ%}: %> _  Cns ; 
 
 
"Onset vowel Е2 realized in suffix :е rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
  Е2:е <=> [[ Cns - ж: ] (%{ыӹ%}: |ӹ:|ы:|к:)| й: |[Cns | Vow] ж ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) %> _ [в|м|н|т|ш|п] ; 
 
"Onset vowel Е2:э after retained vowel rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Е2:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) %> _ [в|м|н|т|ш|п] ; 
 
"Onset vowel Е3:э after retained vowel rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Е3:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ; 
 
"Onset vowel е:э after retained vowel rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
е:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ; 
!!= **@CODE@** The three onset vowels need checking 2014-01-10 
 
"Stem final ы loss before Е2 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
ы:0 <=> #: Cns* Vow Cns+ _ (HarmDummies:) %>  Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] ; 
           _ (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | %{ыӹе%}: | е | %{аӓ%}: [м|т|ш|%>|#] | Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | Е3: ] ; 
        [ и | у | а | ы ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ; 
	   _ %{back%}: %> а ; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€ карта%>ы%>ын 
!!€ карт0%>ы%>0н  
!!€ янжы%{back%}>аш 
!!€ янж00>аш 
 
 
"Stem final ӹ loss before Е2 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
ӹ:0 <=> #: Cns* Vow Cns+ _ (HarmDummies:) %> Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] ; 
           _ (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf: ) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | %{ыӹе%}: | е | %{аӓ%}: [м|т|ш|%>|#]| Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | Е3: ] ; 
        [ и | ӱ | ӓ | ӹ ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€ бирка%{front%}%>ӹ%>ӹн 
!!€ бирк00%>ӹ%>0н 
 
 
!! ### Vowel harmony rules
 
"Onset vowel ыӹ0 realized in suffix  %{ыӹØ%}:ы rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  %{ыӹØ%}:ы <=> 
  [BHARM  Cns  | :BackVow Cns+ | Cns %{back%}: (Ь2:) %> | BackVow Cns+ %>]  _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns ] | # ] ; 
!  [ BHARM  Cns   (HarmDummies:) (( (ы) Ь2:) %> )| BHARM ( н | л ) (HarmDummies:) (ы) Ь2: %> | BackVow й: (HarmDummies:)( (ы) Ь2:0 ) %> | :BackVow Cns* (HarmDummies:) | [ :BackVow | BHARM ] [ Cns+ | Cns* й ] [ %{ыӹØ%}:0 | ы:0 ] %> ] _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns ] | # ] ; 
                 
! [[ Cns | й ]+ %> | %> [ %> | BackVow | е | ArchiVow: | Cns ]* [ Cns | й ] ( %> ) ] _ [ ( %> ) Cns | # ] ; 
 
"Onset vowel %{ыӹØ%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹØ%}:ӹ rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
  %{ыӹØ%}:ӹ <=> 
[FHARM  Cns | :FrontVow [Cns+|й] | Cns %{front%}: (Ь2:) %> | FrontVow [Cns+|й] %>]  _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns ] | # ] ; 
![ FHARM [ Cns  | й ]  ( (ӹ) Ь2: ) | :FrontVow Cns+ | [ :FrontVow | FHARM ] [ Cns+ | Cns* й ] [ %{ыӹØ%}:0 | ӹ:0 ] ( (ӹ) Ь2:) ] (%{front%}:) %> _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns  ] | # ] ; 
      FHARM  н _ т ; 
![ :FrontVow :0* ]  н _ т ; 
!                 :FrontVow  н _ т ; 
                  FHARM [ ш | м ] (%{front%}:) _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns  ] | # ] ; 
 
"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:ӹ rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
%{ыӹе%}:ӹ <=> [FHARM [ Cns | й ] | [ Cns | й ] %{front%}: ] %> _  ; 
! FHARM [ Cns | й ] (%{front%}:) %> _  ; 
 
"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:ы rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
%{ыӹе%}:ы <=> [BHARM [ Cns | й ]|[ Cns | й ] %{back%}: ] %> _  ; 
!BHARM [ Cns | й ] (%{back%}:) %> _  ; 
 
"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:е rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
%{ыӹе%}:е <=> [ Cns: | й: ] [ ы:0 | ӹ:0 | %{ыӹØ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) %> _  ; 
! [ ы: | ӹ: | %{ыӹØ%}: ]  %> _  ; 
        
"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:э rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
%{ыӹе%}:э <=>  Vow (HarmDummies:)  %> _  ; 
!  Vow   %> _  ; 
 
"Onset vowel %{ыӹэ%} realized in Ine and Ill suffixes %{ыӹэ%}:0 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ыӹэ%}:0 <=> [ ы | ӹ ] %> _  ; 
!!€# комбы%>%{ыӹэ%}штем 
!!€0 комбы00штем 
 
"Onset vowel %{ыӹэ%} realized in Ine and Ill suffixes %{ыӹэ%}:0 rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ыӹэ%}:э <=> [ а | ӓ | я | о ] %> _  ; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€# олма%>%{ыӹэ%}штем 
!!€0 олма0эштем 
 
 
!%{аӓ%}:я <=> Vow й:0 (ы:0|ӹ:0) %> _ [м|т|ш|%>|#] ; 
"Affix mid or final front %{аӓ%}:ӓ rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
 %{аӓ%}:ӓ <=> [ Cns: - [й:|ь:] ] %{front%}:  [(%^ConsTransf:) Ь2: %> Cns*| %> ]   _ ; 
  [:е | :ӓ | :и | :ӹ ] ([ Cns: - [й:|ь:] ]+) %> _ ;
   FrontVow Cns*  %> л _ ; 
![ FHARM (ӹ:) [ :Cns (%>)| %> Cns:+ ] | :FrontVow Cns* %> ( %{ыӹØ%}: м ) | %> [ Е2:е | %{ыӹе%}:е | %{ыӹе%}:э | %{ыӹе%}:ӹ | %{ыӹе%}: м %{аӓ%}:ӓ ] [в|д|м|н|т|ш] Cns:* | Cns ӹ: %> ] _ [д|м|н|т|ш|к|%>|#] ; 
!      [е [в|д|м|н|т|ш]|ӓ] %> Cns* _ [д|м|н|т|ш|к|%>|#] ; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€# комбы%>еш%>н%{аӓ%} 
!!€0 комб00еш0нӓ 

!          :FrontVow Cns* %> р _ к ; 
!          FrontVow  ӹ: %> _ # ; 
          [FHARM [ Cns:0 - [й:0|ь:0] ]+] %> Cns* _ ; 
          [:FrontVow | :FrontLabVow] [ Cns:0 - [й:0|ь:0] ]+ %> Cns* _ ; 
!! ӹштӓш+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **do/tehdä** 
!!€ ӹштӹ%{front%}%>%{аӓ%} 
!          FHARM [ Cns:0 - [й:0|ь:0] | :FrontVow | :FrontLabVow]+ %> Cns* _ ; 
!          [ :FrontVow | :FrontLabVow ] [ :0 - й:0 ]* %> Cns* _ ; 
! [ FHARM (ӹ:) [ :Cns (%>)| %> Cns:+ ] | :FrontVow Cns* %> ( %{ыӹØ%}: м ) | %> [ Е2:е | %{ыӹе%}:е | %{ыӹе%}:ӹ | %{ыӹе%}: м %{аӓ%}:ӓ ] [в|д|м|н|т|ш] Cns:* | Cns ӹ: %> ] _ [д|м|н|т|ш|%>|#] ; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€# библиотека%{front%}%^А2ЫӸ%>л%{аӓ%}н 
!!€0 библиотекӹ00%>лӓн 
 
"Affix mid or final back %{аӓ%}:а rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{аӓ%}:а <=> 
   [ Cns: - [й:|ь:] ] %{back%}: [(%^ConsTransf:) Ь2: %> Cns*| %> ]  _ ; 
 :BackVow  Cns*  _ ; 
  [ :а | :у | :ю | :ё | :о | :ы ] ([ Cns: - [й:|ь:] ]+) %> _ ;
   BackVow Cns*  %> л _ ; 

!! толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: **come/tulla** 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€ тол%{back%}%>%{ыӹе%}н%{аӓ%} 
!!€ тол0%>ына 
 
![ :BackVow  Cns*  %> ( %{ыӹØ%}: м | %{ыӹе%}:ы м ( %{аӓ%}:а д ) | %{ыӹе%}:ы [н|д] ) | :BackVow й %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: м | %{ыӹе%}:ы м ( %{аӓ%}:а д ) | %{ыӹе%}:ы [н|д] ] | BHARM [ й %> %{ыӹØ%}: м  | :Cns  %> |р|н|д|л]| Cns ы: %> ] _ [д|м|н|т|ш|к|%>|#]; 
          BHARM [ Cns:0 - [й:0|ь:0] |:BackVow | :BackLabVow ]+ %> Cns* _ ; 
!          [ :BackVow | :BackLabVow ] [ :0 - й:0 ]* %> Cns* _ ; 
!          BackVow  й: %^ConsTransf:0 %> [ н | д ] _ [м|т|%>|#]; 

!! ##### Tests:
!!€# колт%>%{ыӹØ%}д%{аӓ%} 
!!€0 колт0ыда 
!  # я Cns:+ %> _ ; 
!!€# яд%{back%}%>%{аӓ%}ш 
!!€0 яд0%>аш 
 
"Affix mid or final back %{аӓ%}:я rule"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{аӓ%}:я <=> Vow й: (ы:0|ӹ:0) (HarmDummies:)  %> _ [м|т|ш|%>|#] ; 
          Cns ь:0 (HarmDummies:) %> _ [м|т|ш|%>|#] ; 
